Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1903
Filing officer; duty to refuse.

The Secretary of State, county clerk, register of deeds, or clerk of any court shall refuse to accept for filing any nonconsensual common-law lien.

Laws 2003, LB 655, § 3.